Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.031

Alcohol or controlled substances testing—Authority to order.

The authority of a court to issue an order for testing to determine whether the child has consumed or used alcohol or controlled substances applies to all persons subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.030 regardless of whether the petition was filed before July 27, 1997.

[ 1997 c 68 s 3.]